Utah statutes.
20A-14-204.   Effect of transfer of a district on composition of local school board.

If a portion of one school district becomes part of another school district, any member of the board of education residing within the transferred portion becomes a member of the board of the transferee district and shall serve the remainder of the term to which the member was elected.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

